District of Columbia statutes.
11-1528

Privilege; confidentiality.

(a)

(1)

Subject to paragraph (2), the filing of papers with, and the giving of testimony before, the Commission shall be privileged. Subject to paragraph (2), hearings before the Commission, the record thereof, and materials and papers filed in connection with such hearings shall be confidential.

(2)

(A)

The judge whose conduct or health is the subject of any proceedings under this chapter may disclose or authorize the disclosure of any information under paragraph (1).

(B)

With respect to a prosecution of a witness for perjury or on review of a decision of the Commission, the record of hearings before the Commission and all papers filed in connection with such hearing shall be disclosed to the extent required for such prosecution or review.

(C)

Upon request, the Commission shall disclose, on a privileged and confidential basis, to the District of Columbia Judicial Nomination Commission any information under paragraph (1) concerning any judge being considered by such nomination commission for elevation to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals or for chief judge of a District of Columbia court.

(b)

If the Commission determines that no grounds for removal or involuntary retirement exist it shall notify the judge and inquire whether the judge desires the Commission to make available to the public information pertaining to the nature of its investigation, its hearings, findings, determinations, or any other fact related to its proceedings regarding the judge’s health or conduct. Upon receipt of such request in writing from the judge, the Commission shall make such information available to the public.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 497, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 28, 1986, 100 Stat. 3228, Pub. L. 99-573, § 11
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(42), 108 Stat. 713
1981 Ed., § 11-1528.
1973 Ed., § 11-1528.